Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.194.005

Intent—Findings.

The legislature intends to provide for the operation of education programs for juvenile inmates incarcerated in adult jails.

The legislature finds that this chapter fully satisfies any constitutional duty to provide education programs for juvenile inmates in adult jails. The legislature further finds that biennial appropriations for education programs under this chapter amply provide for any constitutional duty to educate juvenile inmates in adult jails.

[ 2010 c 226 s 1.]